Wisconsin, session 2025, AB68.
do enact as follows:AB68,11Section 1. 961.385 (2) (cs) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB68,2,62961.385 (2) (cs) 1. Require that a patient’s records under the program be 3reviewed before the practitioner issues a prescription order for the patient. The 4review required under this subdivision may be performed by the practitioner or by 5the practitioner’s agent in accordance with applicable standards of practice. This 6subdivision does not apply after April 1, 2025 2030.AB68,27Section 2. 961.385 (5) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB68,2,88961.385 (5) (b) This subsection does not apply after October 30, 2025 2030.AB68,39Section 3. 961.385 (6) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB68,2,1110961.385 (6) (a) The results of the board’s review under sub. (5). This 11paragraph does not apply after October 30, 2025 2030.AB68,2,1212